Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB737.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5602 of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 5602. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Public safety projects." The term includes any or all of the following:(1) Emergency medical services.(2) Both the provision and the availability of services, including administrative support, coordination of service 123456789101112131415161718 delivery and financing services, relating to emergency medical services.* * *Section 2. Title 53 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5606.1. Public safety authorities.(a) Authorization.--Except as provided under subsection (h) , the creation of an authority for the purpose of public safety projects shall be restricted to a county. Counties may enter into an agreement to create a joint authority under this subsection.(b) Municipal representation.--A county that creates a public safety authority shall make a reasonable effort to include representatives of the municipalities the county serves in the governance structure of the public safety authority.(c) Satisfaction of requirement to provide emergency services.--A municipality's requirement under the laws of this Commonwealth to provide emergency services shall be satisfied by entering into a contract or agreement with a public safety authority under this section.(d) Contracts.-- (1) Municipalities may enter into contracts or agreements with the authority as may be deemed necessary or convenient in connection with a public safety project.(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), a public safety authority may not provide services or assess rates or other charges without the municipality opting by ordinance to enter into a contract with the authority.(3) In the case of an authority operating as a dedicated emergency response organization as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7332 (relating to definitions), nothing in this subsection is 20250SB0737PN1278 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intended to interfere with or relieve the dedicated emergency response organization from an obligation or commitment to respond to a dispatch from a public safety answering point or mutual aid system or to invoice and receive payment from an appropriate party for the services rendered.(e) Rates and other charges.--(1) In addition to any other power of an authority to fix, alter, charge and collect rates and other charges in the area served by its facilities, a public safety authority may fix, alter, charge and collect rates and other charges for the services that the authority provides, which rates and charges shall be reasonable and uniform. The fixing or altering of a rate or other charge or a change to the manner in which a rate or other charge is charged or collected under this subsection must comply with all applicable notice requirements under 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings) and 45 Pa.C.S. (relating to legal notices).(2) A public safety authority must comply with section 5612 (relating to money of authority).(f) Existing authorities.--Notwithstanding any provision of this section, an authority that provides public safety services in existence on the effective date of this section shall be permitted to continue operation, without limitation, as a public safety project as provided under this section.(g) Duties of Department of Community and Economic Development.--The Department of Community and Economic Development, in consultation with the Director of the Bureau of Emergency Medical Services of the Department of Health in relation to emergency medical services authorities, shall:(1) Work with relevant stakeholders to develop guidance 20250SB0737PN1278 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and assistance for counties to create public safety authorities under this section.(2) Contract with educational and technical assistance providers to aid counties in starting and operating public safety authorities.(h) Municipal authorization.--Municipalities in a county may create a joint public safety authority if: (1) the county, by resolution, states that it does not intend to create a public safety authority; or(2) municipalities in the county petition NOTIFY the county, by passing resolutions, OF THE INTENT to create a public safety authority and the county does not create the authority within 120 days of receiving the petition . Section 3. Section 5607(b)(2) of Title 53 is amended and subsection (a) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 5607. Purposes and powers.(a) Scope of projects permitted.--Every authority incorporated under this chapter shall be a body corporate and politic and shall be for the purposes of financing working capital; acquiring, holding, constructing, financing, improving, maintaining and operating, owning or leasing, either in the capacity of lessor or lessee, projects of the following kind and character and providing financing for insurance reserves:* * *(19) Only in the case of an authority authorized under section 5606.1 (relating to public safety authorities), public safety projects.(b) Limitations.--This section is subject to the following limitations:* * *20250SB0737PN1278 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The purpose and intent of this chapter being to benefit the people of the Commonwealth by, among other things, increasing their commerce, health, safety and prosperity and not to unnecessarily burden or interfere with existing business by the establishment of competitive enterprises, none of the powers granted by this chapter shall be exercised in the construction, financing, improvement, maintenance, extension or operation of any project or projects or providing financing for insurance reserves which in whole or in part shall duplicate or compete with existing enterprises serving substantially the same purposes. This limitation shall not apply to the exercise of the powers granted under this section:(i) for facilities and equipment for the collection, removal or disposal of ashes, garbage, rubbish and other refuse materials by incineration, landfill or other methods if each municipality organizing or intending to use the facilities of an authority having such powers shall declare by resolution or ordinance that it is desirable for the health and safety of the people of such municipality that it use the facilities of the authority and state if any contract between such municipality and any other person, firm or corporation for the collection, removal or disposal of ashes, garbage, rubbish and other refuse material has by its terms expired or is terminable at the option of the municipality or will expire within six months from the date such ordinance becomes effective;(ii) for industrial development projects if the authority does not develop industrial projects which will 20250SB0737PN1278 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 compete with existing industries;(iii) for authorities created for the purpose of providing business improvements and administrative services if each municipality organizing an authority for such a project shall declare by resolution or ordinance that it is desirable for the entire local government unit to improve the business district;(iv) to hospital projects or health centers to be leased to or financed with loans to public hospitals, nonprofit corporation health centers or nonprofit hospital corporations serving the public or to school building projects and facilities to be leased to or financed with loans to private, nonprofit, nonsectarian secondary schools, colleges and universities, State-related universities and community colleges or to facilities, as limited under the provisions of this section, to produce steam or to generate electric power if each municipality organizing an authority for such a project shall declare by resolution or ordinance that it is desirable for the health, safety and welfare of the people in the area served by such facilities to have such facilities provided by or financed through an authority;(v) to provide financing for insurance reserves if each municipality or authority intending to use any proceeds thereof shall declare by resolution or ordinance that it is desirable for the health, safety and welfare of the people in such local government unit or served by such authority; [or](vi) to projects for financing working capital[.]; or20250SB0737PN1278 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) to public safety projects that support existing enterprises serving substantially the same purposes.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0737PN1278 - 7 - 12345